Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5469.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-64.25-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64.25 entitled "Small
Business Assistance Program" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64.25-6. Micro-loan allocation.
(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, not less than ten percent (10%)
and not more than twenty-five percent (25%) of program funds will be allocated to “micro loans”
with a principal amount between two thousand dollars ($2,000) and twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000). Micro loans will be administered by lending organizations, which will be selected by
the commerce corporation on a competitive basis and shall have experience in providing technical
and financial assistance to microenterprises.
(b) For the FY 25-26, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) is hereby appropriated
to this program from the general revenue fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001084
========